Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 26 Rights for Persons with Developmental Disabilities

40.1-26-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rights for Persons with Developmental Disabilities.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-26-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Advocate” means: (i) A legal guardian; or (ii) An individual acting on behalf of a person with a developmental disability in a manner clearly consistent with the interests of the person with a developmental disability and includes a family member, friend, or professional advocate. Whenever possible, an advocate should be selected by the person with a disability.

“Agency” means any person or organization that provides day-program services, residential services, support services, or advocacy services for persons with developmental disabilities, and that is licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq.

“Applicant” means any person with a developmental disability who has applied for services from the division of developmental disabilities and/or any agency licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq.

“Aversive interventions” means a class of stimuli that are followed by escape or avoidance response.

“Behavioral treatment intervention” means any intervention or treatment to develop or strengthen adaptive appropriate behaviors through the application of behavioral interventions and to simultaneously reduce the frequency of maladaptive or inappropriate behaviors. Behavior interventions encompass interventions, which refer to purposeful, clinical manipulation of behavior.

“Competent” means the ability to understand the likely risks and benefits of a procedure or plan when the risks and benefits are presented to the participant in a manner most likely to be understood by the participant in light of his or her cognitive abilities and learning style.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Developmental disability” means a severe chronic disability that is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of impairments; is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22); is likely to continue indefinitely; results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas of major life activity: self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent living, economic self-sufficiency; and reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.

“Individualized plan” means the personalized document that describes an individualized profile of the participant highlighting his or her capabilities, preferences, and interests. The plan describes specific supports in the areas of vocational, social, medical, supported living, and rehabilitation required to meet the specific needs of the participant. The plan includes quality indicators that demonstrate the plan has met the expectations of the participant and the participant is satisfied with the support services he or she is receiving; provided, however, that authorizations for services and funding issued prior to July 1, 2011, are null and void. Authorizations for services will be paid at the rate effective when in the quarter the service was provided.

“Participant” means any person eighteen (18) years or older, with a developmental disability who receives services from the division of developmental disabilities and/or an agency licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Relative” means a member of the participant’s or applicant’s family who has been actively involved in the participant’s or applicant’s life; has an ongoing relationship with the participant or applicant; and is supportive in a manner clearly consistent with the best interests of the participant or applicant.

“Seclusion” means placing a participant alone in a locked room without supervision.

“Serious incidents” means any situation involving a person with developmental disabilities in which the person:

Has sustained an injury that requires medical care or treatment beyond routine first aid;

Has been missing;

Has died;

Has been involved in a criminal act; or

Has been subject to a medication error.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 136, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 24.

40.1-26-3.
Participants’ rights.

In addition to any other rights provided by state or federal laws, a participant as defined in this chapter shall be entitled to the following rights:

To be treated with dignity, respect for privacy, and have the right to a safe and supportive environment;

To be free from verbal and physical abuse;

To engage in any activity, including employment, appropriate to his or her age, and interests in the most integrated community setting;

No participant shall be required to perform labor that involves the essential operation and maintenance of the agency or the regular supervision or care of other participants. Participants may however, be requested to perform labor involving normal housekeeping and home-maintenance functions if these responsibilities are documented in the participant’s individualized plan;

To participate in the development of his or her individualized plan and to provide informed consent to its implementation or to have an advocate provide informed consent if the participant is not competent to do so;

To have access to his or her individualized plan and other medical, social, financial, vocational, psychiatric, or other information included in the file maintained by the agency;

To give written informed consent prior to the imposition of any plan designed to modify behavior, including those that utilize aversive techniques or impair the participant’s liberty, or to have an advocate provide written informed consent if the participant is not competent to do so. Provided, however, that if the participant is competent to provide consent but cannot provide written consent, the agency shall accept an alternate form of consent and document in the participant’s record how such consent was obtained;

To register a complaint regarding an alleged violation of rights through the grievance procedure delineated in §

40.1-26-5

;

To be free from unnecessary restraint. Restraints shall not be employed as punishment, for the convenience of the staff, or as a substitute for an individualized plan. Restraints shall impose the least possible restrictions consistent with their purpose and shall be removed when the emergency ends. Restraints shall not cause physical injury to the participant and shall be designed to allow the greatest possible comfort. Restraints shall be subject to the following conditions:

Physical restraint shall be employed only in emergencies to protect the participant or others from imminent injury or when prescribed by a physician, when necessary, during the conduct of a specific medical or surgical procedure or if necessary for participant protection during the time that a medical condition exists;

Chemical restraint shall only be used when prescribed by a physician in extreme emergencies in which physical restraint is not possible and the harmful effects of the emergency clearly outweigh the potential harmful effects of the chemical restraints;

No participant shall be placed in seclusion;

The agency shall have a written policy that defines the use of restraints, the staff members who may authorize their use, and a mechanism for monitoring and controlling their use;

All orders for restraint, as well as the required frequency of staff observation of the participant, shall be written;

To have, at any time, access to telephone communication;

To receive visitors of a participant’s choosing at any time;

To keep and be allowed to spend one’s own money;

To be provided advance written notice explaining the reason(s) why the participant is no longer eligible for service from the agency;

To religious freedom and practice;

To communicate by sealed mail or otherwise with persons of one’s choosing;

To select and wear one’s own clothing and to keep and use one’s own personal possessions;

To have prompt access to current newspapers, magazines, and radio and television programming;

To have opportunities for physical exercise and outdoor recreation;

To provide informed consent prior to the imposition of any invasive medical treatment, including any surgical procedure, or to have a legal guardian, or in the absence of a legal guardian, a relative as defined in this chapter, provide informed consent if the participant is not competent to do so. Information upon which a participant shall make necessary treatment and/or surgery decisions shall be presented to the participant in a manner consistent with his or her learning style and shall include, but not be limited to:

The nature and consequences of the procedure(s);

The risks, benefits, and purpose of the procedure(s); and

Alternate procedures available;

The informed consent of a participant, or his or her legal guardian, or, in the absence of a legal guardian, a relative as defined in this chapter, may be withdrawn at any time, with or without cause, prior to treatment. The absence of informed consent notwithstanding, a licensed and qualified physician may render emergency medical care or treatment to any participant who has been injured or who is suffering from an acute illness, disease, or condition if, within a reasonable degree of medical certainty, delay in initiation of emergency medical care or treatment would endanger the health of the participant;

Each participant shall have a central record. The record shall include data pertaining to admissions and other information as may be required under regulations by the department;

Admissions — As part of the procedure for the admission of a participant to an agency, each participant or applicant, or advocate if the participant or applicant is not competent, shall be fully informed, orally and in writing, of all rules, regulations, and policies governing participant conduct and responsibilities, including grounds for dismissal, procedures for discharge, and all anticipated financial charges, including all costs not covered under federal and/or state programs, by other third-party payors or by the agency’s basic per-diem rate. The written notice shall include information regarding the participant’s or applicant’s right to appeal the admission or dismissal decisions of the agency;

Upon termination of services to or death of a participant, a final accounting shall be made of all personal effects and/or money belonging to the participant held by the agency. All personal effects and/or money, including interest, shall be promptly released to the participant, or his or her heirs;

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude intervention in the form of appropriate and reasonable restraint should it be necessary to protect individuals from physical injury to themselves or others.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 136, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 11.

40.1-26-3.1.
Applicant’s rights.

In addition to any other rights provided by state or federal laws, an applicant, as defined in this chapter, shall be entitled to:

Notification in a timely manner regarding his or her application;

Receive information regarding the appeal process;

Receive information regarding the scope and availability of services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 3.

40.1-26-4.
Requirements of agencies.

In a manner consistent with the participant’s learning style, every agency shall provide to participants and/or advocates, upon entry into the agency and at the yearly review of the individualized plan information describing the participant rights, the name, address, and phone number of the human rights committee chair, or his or her designee; the participant grievance procedure as required by §

40.1-26-5

; and the availability of free legal assistance. Every agency shall also post a notice describing the information set out in this subsection.

Every agency shall establish or participate in a human rights committee comprised of persons with developmental disabilities; family members of persons with developmental disabilities; qualified persons who have either experience or training in contemporary practices to change inappropriate participant behavior; advocates of persons with developmental disabilities; and staff of agencies providing services to persons with developmental disabilities; provided, however, that employees and/or their spouses of the agency shall not participate in that agency’s human rights committee as voting members.

Every agency shall utilize the human rights committee to review, approve, and monitor individual plans designed to modify behavior that utilize aversive techniques or impair the participant’s liberty and other plans, policies, and procedures that involve risks to participant protection and rights. No agency shall implement a plan to modify behavior, or any other plan, policy, or procedure described in this section without prior approval by the human rights committee.

Every agency shall maintain incident reports documenting (1) any injury, any physical or emergency chemical restraint, or alleged human rights violation, including, but not limited to, allegations of abuse, neglect, mistreatment, and (2) serious incidents.

Every agency shall provide the human rights committee with copies of all incident reports completed by the agency.

Every agency shall provide the human rights committee with copies of all grievances filed by participants or advocates and a copy of the final resolution of the grievance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 83 § 2.

40.1-26-4.1.
Aversive interventions — Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful for any agency to use prohibited aversive intervention techniques on a person with a developmental disability in the state of Rhode Island. The specific strategies to be prohibited within the context of behavioral treatment interventions include, but are not limited to, the following:

Noxious, painful, intrusive stimuli or activities that result in pain;

Any form of noxious, painful, or intrusive spray or inhalant;

Electric shock;

Water spray to the face;

Pinches and deep muscle squeezes;

Shouting, screaming, or using a loud, sharp, harsh voice to frighten or threaten or use of obscene language;

Withholding adequate sleep;

Withholding adequate shelter or bedding;

Withholding bathroom facilities;

Withholding meals, essential nutrition, or hydration;

Removal of an individual’s personal property as punishment;

Unobserved time-out or room/area solely used for time out;

Facial or auditory screening devices; and

Use of chemical restraints instead of positive programs or medical treatments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 136, § 1.

40.1-26-5.
Participant grievance procedure.

Every agency must establish a written grievance procedure. The grievance procedure shall be presented to every participant or applicant in a manner consistent with the participant’s or applicant’s learning style and be conspicuously posted in each agency. The notice of grievance procedure shall include the name of organizations that provide free legal assistance.

The participant, applicant, or advocate shall be entitled to initiate a grievance at all times and to this end, grievance forms shall be made available at all times. It shall be the duty of each agency to encourage and assist the participant or applicant in exercising his or her rights under this section.

The participant, applicant, or advocate shall initiate the grievance by filing a grievance form with the director of the agency. The director shall forthwith forward a copy of the grievance form to the chair of the human rights committee.

The director, or his or her designee, with the assistance of the chair of the human rights committee, or his or her designee, shall investigate the grievance and issue a written decision to the participant, applicant, or advocate within five (5) business days of receipt of the grievance. The written decision shall include a copy of the grievance; a list of persons interviewed in the investigation; the steps taken to resolve the grievance; and the conclusion of the director, or his or her designee.

A participant, applicant, or advocate who is not satisfied with the decision of the director shall have the right to appeal that decision under regulations promulgated by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. These regulations shall, at a minimum, provide for review of the grievance as a “contested case” at an administrative hearing that meets the requirements of §

42-35-9

. The chair of the human rights committee, or his or her designee, shall, if necessary, assist the participant in requesting a review.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 2.

40.1-26-6.
Immunity from liability.

The state shall protect and hold harmless any volunteer member of a human rights committee from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any, arising out of any claim, demand, or suit for damages resulting from acts or omissions committed in the discharge of his or her duties with the committee and within the scope of his or her activities therewith that may constitute negligence but which acts are not wanton, malicious, or grossly negligent as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1.

40.1-26-6.1.
Good-faith immunity.

Any volunteer member of a human rights committee, acting in good faith and meeting the requirements of this statute, shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might be incurred in the performance of his or her duties as a volunteer member of a human rights committee and shall not be made to answer in any court for his or her participation as a volunteer member of a human rights committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 3.

40.1-26-7.
Deprivation of rights — Penalty.

Any person who willfully withholds from, or denies to, any participant in an agency any of his or her rights as granted in this chapter or who retaliates against a participant who exercises the right to register an alleged violation of rights or on whose behalf a grievance is filed, shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 143.

40.1-26-8.
Disqualification.

A person convicted of any crime under this chapter shall be disqualified from holding any position in any agency licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 3.

40.1-26-9.
Nonduplication.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any state or federal agency from its responsibilities and obligations as set forth in state or federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 3.

40.1-26-10.
Office of quality assurance.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall establish, within the division of developmental disabilities, an office of quality assurance for persons with developmental disabilities. The purpose of the office shall be to:

Assure the quality of services provided by agencies or individuals to participants as defined in this chapter;

Provide for the protection and promotion of the legal and civil rights of participants provided in §

40.1-26-3

;

As the designated office for the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, investigate and evaluate, or cause to be investigated and evaluated, reports made pursuant to §

40.1-27-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 83, § 3.

40.1-26-11.
Enforcement.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 136, § 1.